Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-808
Signs or advertising on bridges or culverts; violation; penalty.

If any person or persons, whether for himself, herself, or themselves or as the agent, servant, or employee of any firm, association, corporation, partnership, or limited liability company violates section 39-807, such person or persons shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1917, c. 186, § 2, p. 424;

C.S.1922, § 2757;

C.S.1929, § 39-843;

R.S.1943, § 39-808;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 209;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 209.